California, session 20252026, AB2192.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 6356.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code is amended to read:6356.5. (a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage and use of, or other consumption in this state of, farm equipment and machinery, and the parts thereof, purchased for use by a qualified person to be used primarily in producing and harvesting agricultural products.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified person” means any person engaged in a line of business described in Codes 0111 to 0291, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 Edition, and any other person that uses farm equipment and machinery to assist this person in the lines of business described in this paragraph in producing and harvesting agricultural products.(2) “Farm equipment and machinery” means implements of husbandry, as defined in Section 411.(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(d) The exemption provided by this section shall be effective starting September 1, 2001.(e) For the purpose of complying with Section 41, the Legislature finds the following with respect to the amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision:(1) The specific goals of the exemption are as follows:(A) To offset the growing cost of compliance in the State of California.(B) To alleviate the cost of investing in new, cleaner farming equipment.(2) The performance indicators for the Legislature to use in determining whether the exemption achieves the stated goal shall be the number of taxpayers claiming the exemption pursuant to this section and the total dollar value of exemptions allowed.(f) This section shall be in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 6356.5 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:6356.5. (a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage and use of, or other consumption in this state of, farm equipment and machinery, and the parts thereof, purchased for use by a qualified person to be used primarily in producing and harvesting agricultural products.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Qualified person” means any person engaged in a line of business described in Codes 0111 to 0291, inclusive, of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual published by the United States Office of Management and Budget, 1987 Edition, and any other person that uses farm equipment and machinery to assist this person in the lines of business described in this paragraph in producing and harvesting agricultural products.(2) “Farm equipment and machinery” means implements of husbandry, as defined in Section 411.(c) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of the Bradley-Burns Uniform Local Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 7200)) or the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied by a county, city, or district pursuant to, or in accordance with, either of those laws.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the exemption established by this section does not apply with respect to any tax levied pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2, or pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution.(d) The exemption provided by this section shall be effective starting September 1, 2001.(e) This section shall become operative January 1, 2032.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. The sum of 200 two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Controller from the General Fund to make the payments to counties and cities required by Section 2230 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to reimburse them for revenue losses caused by this act in the initial fiscal year in which this act is effective. The appropriation made by this section shall be allocated in the manner specified in Section 2230.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.